Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7432.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 12-12 of the General Laws entitled "Indictments, Informations and
Complaints" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
12-12-23. Acquittal in another jurisdiction as bar to prosecution.
If a violation of any criminal law is a violation of a federal law or the law of another state,
an acquittal under federal law or the law of another state for the same set of facts or acts shall be a
bar to prosecution in this state, unless there exists newly discovered evidence which would
substantially indicate that prosecution in this state is warranted.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004520
========